Arkansas, session 2025, SB344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Cabinet-level department transfer of the
Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program from Department of Health to Department of
Transformation and Shared Services.
(a) The Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program is transferred by a
cabinet-level department transfer under § 25-43-101 et seq. from the
Department of Health to the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.
(b) The administrative functions of the Healthy Employee Lifestyle
Program are transferred by a cabinet-level department transfer under § 25-43-
1502 from the Department of Health to the Department of Transformation and
Shared Services.
(c) The statutory authority, powers, duties, functions, records,
*LGL113*
02/27/2025 8:12:27 AM LGL113

SB344
personnel, property, contracts, and unexpended balances of appropriations,
allocations, or other funds, including the functions of budgeting or
purchasing of the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program, are transferred to the
Department of Transformation and Shared Services.
(d)(1) The transfer of the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program does not
affect the orders, rules, regulations, directives, or standards made or
promulgated by the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program before the effective
date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, regulations, directives, or standards
under subdivision (d)(1) of this section shall continue to be in effect until
amended or repealed under authority given by law.
(e) The Department of Health shall grant access to and provide all
information requested by the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program to accomplish
the transfer of the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program and the mission of the
Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 21-4-106 is amended to read as follows:
21-4-106. Leave of absence for participation in Healthy Employee
Lifestyle Program — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section:
(1) “Agency” means a department, agency, bureau, including the
Bureau of Legislative Research, board, or commission of any branch of state
government;
(2) “Employee” means a full-time employee of the State of
Arkansas or any branch, department, agency, board, bureau, including the
Bureau of Legislative Research, or commission of any branch of state
government; and
(3)(2) “Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program” means the incentive
program of the Department of Health Department of Transformation and Shared
Services that will reward encourages and rewards an employee for regular
exercise, good nutrition, and other healthy lifestyle choices.; and
(3) "State entity" means a department, agency, bureau, including
the Bureau of Legislative Research, board, or commission of any branch of
state government.
(b)(1) Upon completion of a pilot program to be conducted by the
department, the department The department shall:
02/27/2025 8:12:27 AM LGL113

SB344
(A) Make Manage the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program
available to all agency directors; and
(B) Assist the agencies state entities in the
administration of the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program's implementation
Program.
(2) Upon completion of the pilot program, every agency director
shall consider making the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program available to the
agency's employees. On or before July 1, 2026, a state entity shall allow for
employee participation in the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program.
(c)(1) At the discretion of the agency director, an employee may be
granted paid leave of up to three (3) days per calendar year for satisfactory
compliance with the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program. The department shall
determine appropriate methods to reward employees who satisfactorily complete
the requirements of the Healthy Employee Lifestyle Program.
(2) A reward under subdivision (c)(1) of this section may
include up to twenty-four (24) hours of leave per calendar year.
(2)(3) The leave granted under subdivision (c)(2) of this
section shall be used in the calendar year in which it was granted within six
(6) months of approval.
(3)(4) The leave granted under subdivision (c)(2) of this
section is not compensable at termination.
(d) Each agency state entity shall identify and maintain, if
practicable, in or near each agency building an area or areas that employees
may use for walking exercise.












02/27/2025 8:12:27 AM LGL113